Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5

Beer and Wine — Manufacture, Sale, and Transportation Generally

Publisher's Notes.

This chapter contains provisions which exclusively regulate the manufacture, sale, and transportation of beer and wine. However, beer and wine are also regulated under provisions of this title governing “alcoholic beverages” generally, with the applicability of such provisions frequently dependent upon the alcoholic content of the beverage or, in the case of wine, its place of manufacture. Consequently, the provisions of this chapter must be read in conjunction with the remainder of the title in order to form a complete picture of the regulatory scheme as it applies to beer and wine. Specific provisions governing excise taxes on beer and wine, local option elections for beer, and on-premises consumption of wines are found in chapters 7-9.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1941, No. 304, § 2: approved Mar. 26, 1941. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that there is a great need for industries in the State of Arkansas for the purpose of decreasing unemployment, increasing revenues, and minimizing the consumption of intoxicating liquors, and that the manufacture and sale of native wines will relieve this need. It is therefore declared that an emergency exists, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1977, No. 467, § 3: Mar. 17, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that more strict control over the distribution of beer within this state is needed; that the current statutory law in this area is inadequate; and that this act is required to give direction to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 1065, § 6: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that present law is inadequate as it relates to the serving of alcoholic beverages at festivals; that this act clarifies that law; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that the benefits hereof will be available during the upcoming festival season. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-5-101. Wholesaler of beer and light wine may sell malt liquor.

A person, firm, or corporation having a permit to sell beer and light wine at wholesale shall be permitted to sell to liquor retailers malt liquor containing greater than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 165, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-504.3; Acts 2013, No. 527, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section text.

Cross References.

Wholesalers, §3-4-605.

3-5-102. Additional license to sell native wines not required.

Any retail liquor dealer who has been duly licensed as such shall have the right without any additional license fee to sell native wines manufactured from fruits, vegetables, and other products grown in the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 304, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-625.

Cross References.

Retail permits, §3-4-604.

3-5-103. Distribution areas.

(a)

All beer wholesalers in this state shall notify the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board of the brand name of all beer to be distributed and of the agreement between the applicant and the brewer as to the geographical territory wherein the applicant may distribute beer.

(b)

In the event an agreement between a beer wholesaler and a brewer concerning the geographical territory within which the wholesaler may distribute beer is modified or changed as to the geographical territory, then the beer wholesaler shall notify the board of a new agreement or modification of agreement within sixty (60) days of the modification agreement or new agreement.

(c)

It shall be unlawful for any wholesale beer distributor to sell beer outside the geographical territory described in the notice given the board.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 467, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-513.1.

3-5-104. Wine tasting events.

(a)(1)

Native wineries and licensed wine and spirits wholesalers, upon prior approval by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, shall be allowed to conduct wine tasting events for educational and promotional purposes at any location in this state without obtaining a wine sampling permit under this section if written notice is given to the division at least ten (10) days prior to the event.

(2)

Requests for approval to conduct wine tasting events must be received by the division at least ten (10) days prior to the event.

(b)(1)

A person, other than a native winery, licensed to sell wine, beer, or spirits under a retail liquor permit as defined in §3-4-604 may conduct tasting events for educational and promotional purposes on the person's premises after obtaining a sampling permit from the division as provided in subsection (f) of this section.

(2)(A)

Wine, beer, or spirits purchased by the person permitted under this section to conduct a tasting event shall not be exempt from the gross receipts and use taxes.

(B)

If the person removes wine, beer, or spirits from his or her inventory for use in a tasting event, the wine, beer, or spirits shall be subject to the gross receipts taxes as a withdrawal from stock.

(3)

A wholesaler may not:

(A)

Offer special discounts on wine, beer, or spirits sold for the purpose of a tasting event; or

(B)

Provide wine, beer, or spirits without charge to a person licensed to sell wine at retail for the purpose of a tasting event.

(c)

No tasting event may be held pursuant to this section in any facility licensed by the division.

(d)

No motor vehicle in which supplies for tasting events are carried and no person shall be subject to arrest nor shall the supplies be subject to seizure for over possession in a dry area.

(e)

The criminal penalties for drinking in public as prescribed by §5-71-212(c) are not applicable to any tasting event approved by the division pursuant to this section.

(f)(1)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue a sampling permit if the applicant:

(A)

Is licensed by the director to sell wine, beer, spirits, or any combination, at retail; and

(B)

Pays a license fee of:

(i)

Five hundred dollars ($500) for either a wine license, beer license, or spirits license; or

(ii)

One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a combined wine, beer, and spirits license.

(2)(A)

The sampling permit allows the person to conduct tasting events on the person's premises during regular hours of operation. A sampling permit shall expire on June 30 of each year.

(B)

The samples shall be limited to a total of:

(i)

Three (3) one-half ounce (0.5 oz.) wine servings per customer each day for on-premises consumption;

(ii)

Two (2) two ounce (2 oz.) beer servings per customer each day for on-premises consumption; and

(iii)

Two (2) one-half ounce (0.5 oz.) spirit servings per customer each day for on-premises consumption.

(3)

The director may promulgate rules to administer and enforce this section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1258, §§ 1-4; 2005, No. 1544, § 1; 2007, No. 455, § 1; 2009, No. 548, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1258, § 5, provided:

“Arkansas Code §§3-8-209,3-8-311,3-8-312, and3-3-306 are repealed to the extent they conflict with this act.”

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “licensed wine and spirits” for “licensed and wine spirits,” “without obtaining a wine sampling permit under this section if” for “provided that” and “ten (10)” for “five (5)”; substituted “ten (10) days” for “two (2) weeks” in (a)(2); added present (b) and (f); and redesignated former (b)-(d) as present (c)-(e).

The 2007 amendment deleted “wine” preceding “tasting” and inserted “beer, or spirits” throughout (b), (c) and (d); in (d), deleted “in possession of supplies for wine tasting events approved pursuant to this section” following “person”; rewrote (f)(1) and (f)(2); and made stylistic and related changes.

The 2009 amendment deleted “wine” preceding “tasting” in (b)(3)(A).

3-5-105. Beer festival permit.

(a)(1)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue a temporary permit to authorize the following:

(A)

A festival to be conducted over a period not to exceed three (3) days;

(B)

The consumption by persons of legal age of beer and malt beverages, as defined by §3-5-1202, and hard cider on the festival grounds;

(C)

The permittee to charge an entry fee for persons wishing to attend the festival and to distribute beer, malt beverages, and hard cider on any day of the week, including Sunday, as provided for in this section, pursuant to the following conditions:

(i)

The distribution of beer, malt beverages, and hard cider, as authorized in this section, shall be limited to the secure area as prescribed in subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section; and

(ii)

The distribution of beer, malt beverages, and hard cider on Sunday, as authorized in this section, shall be limited to the hours between 12:00 noon and 10:00 p.m. central time and be limited to those areas where the retail sale and consumption of alcoholic beverages on Sunday has been approved pursuant to Arkansas law;

(D)

The festival permittee to designate the permitted area on the festival grounds to be approved by the director, such that it is a secure area which will not allow unsupervised access and egress; and

(E)

Participation in this event by any legal brewery, microbrewery, microbrewery-restaurant, distributor, wholesaler, brewpub, small brewery, hard cider manufacturer, or small brewery tap room, whether or not it is currently registered or its product is licensed in the State of Arkansas.

(2)(A)

The director shall not issue this permit if the proposed location is in a dry area.

(B)

The director may issue this permit only to a charitable or nonprofit organization as provided for by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, except that this permit may not be issued to a charitable or nonprofit organization holding a private club license.

(3)

The permittee shall maintain the permit in conjunction with any other legally obtained permit.

(b)(1)

The permittee shall provide to the board no later than one (1) week prior to the event a complete listing of those nonlicensed participants and the products they will be providing. The list shall include proof of delivery, such as an invoice, from the participant which will denote such product or products being provided to the festival.

(2)

The permittee may reimburse participants, if so desired, for the cost of the product provided for the licensed event.

(3)(A)

The permittee shall designate one (1) wholesale distributor currently licensed in Arkansas to act as a temporary warehouse for those nonlicensed products to be stored prior to or following the event.

(B)

Those products shall be stored for a period not to exceed one (1) week prior to and following the event.

(C)

The designated wholesaler shall not be in violation of §3-3-216, §3-5-221, §3-5-1307, or §3-7-104.

(4)(A)

The designated wholesaler shall pay the Miscellaneous Tax Section of the Office of Excise Tax Administration a wholesalers tax of $7.507808 per barrel equal to thirty-one gallons (31 gals.) for each barrel of beer, malt beverage, or hard cider provided for this festival by any participant whose product is not currently licensed or registered in the State of Arkansas.

(B)

This tax shall be paid in conjunction with the currently required miscellaneous tax and shall be paid by the same means as are currently required in the normal course of paying the miscellaneous tax.

(C)

The designated wholesaler shall be reimbursed for this tax by the permittee and may collect a handling fee for services rendered in warehousing such nonlicensed product for this festival.

(c)

Neither the participants in this event nor their products need be registered under §3-2-409, §3-5-1303, or §3-7-106, nor shall they be in violation of §3-3-216, §3-3-304 [repealed], §3-3-305 [repealed], §3-5-205, §3-5-210, §3-5-211, §3-5-216, §3-5-217, or §3-5-221 for this event only.

(d)

The festival participants and attendees while on the festival grounds shall not be found to be in violation of §5-71-212(c) or (d) regarding public consumption. This does not exclude any participant or attendee from being found in violation of §5-71-212(a) or (b) regarding public intoxication.

(e)

The permittee shall pay to the board a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per event for a temporary permit under this section.

(f)

Every provision of this section shall be subject to all beer, malt beverage, and hard cider laws and rules, except that conflicting beer, malt beverage, and hard cider laws and rules shall be inapplicable to any provision of this section to the extent that they conflict herewith.

(g)

A small brewery holding a distribution permit and a beer festival permit may accept and hold beers from out-of-state breweries and distributors for the purpose of pouring at beer festivals.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1065, § 1; 2009, No. 294, § 12; 2017, No. 950, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, § 60; 2019, No. 691, §§ 13-15.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (e), substituted “two hundred fifty dollars ($250)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” and inserted “for a temporary permit under this section.”

The 2017 amendment inserted “small brewery, or small brewery tap room” in (a)(1)(E); and added (g).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice in (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 691 inserted “and hard cider” throughout (a) and twice in (f); inserted “hard cider manufacturer” in (a)(1)(E); inserted “or hard cider” in (b)(4)(A); and made stylistic changes.

3-5-106. Cabins and cottages.

(a)

For purposes of this section, “cabins and cottages” means corporations, partnerships, individuals, limited liability corporations, and other legal entities whose primary function is to provide overnight accommodations to the public, not exceeding a total of twenty (20) guest rooms on the premises, whether operated by the business owner or not.

(b)

Cabins and cottages are authorized to give a complimentary bottle of wine to their guests.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1487, § 1.

3-5-107. Unlawful pricing by brewers and manufacturers.

(a)

As used in this section, “discriminate” means the granting of a more favorable price, allowance, rebate, refund, commission, or discount to one (1) Arkansas distributor or wholesaler than to another Arkansas distributor or wholesaler.

(b)

It is unlawful for:

(1)

A brewer, manufacturer, or other person, firm, or corporation engaging in the business of selling beer, ale, or other malt beverage or malt cooler to a distributor or wholesaler to discriminate in price, allowance, rebate, refund, commission, or discount between distributors or wholesalers licensed in Arkansas; or

(2)(A)

A brewer, manufacturer, or other person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of selling beer, ale, or other malt beverage or malt cooler to a distributor or wholesaler to sell or deliver beer, ale, or other malt beverage or malt cooler to a licensed distributor or wholesaler unless the brewer, manufacturer, person, firm, or corporation files the brewery or dock price of the beer, ale, or other malt beverage or malt cooler by brand and container size with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(B)

A brewery or dock price schedule increase shall not take effect until fourteen (14) days after receipt of the brewery or dock price schedule by the director.

(C)

A brewery or dock price schedule decrease shall not take effect until two (2) days after receipt of the brewery or dock price schedule by the director.

(c)

A violation of this section by a brewer, manufacturer, or other person, firm, or corporation engaging in the business of selling beer, ale, or other malt beverage or malt cooler to a distributor or wholesaler is grounds for denial or suspension of the license of the brewer, manufacturer, or other person, firm, or corporation engaging in the business of selling beer, ale, or other malt beverage or malt cooler to a distributor or wholesaler or other penalties as determined by the director under §3-2-212.

(d)

The director shall adopt rules to implement this section.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 783, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Beer and Light Wine

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter originally applied to beer and light wine of an alcoholic content not in excess of 3.2% by weight. Pursuant to §3-1-103, this subchapter was made to apply to malt and vinous beverages having an alcoholic content of not more than 5% by weight.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 30: approved Aug. 24, 1933. Emergency clause provided: “It is found as a fact that since the Congress of the United States has authorized the manufacture and sale of light wines and beers as herein defined, they are being sold throughout the state, and if operation of this act is delayed they will be generally sold, possessed, transported, and used, with prevention and proper policing impossible; and it is further found that the tax revenues provided for in this act are immediately needed by the state to prevent deficits in the matters that are the objects of the taxes stated herein; an emergency is therefore declared and it is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety that this act shall become effective without delay, and this act shall take effect and be in force at once.”

Acts 1937, No. 261, § 3: Mar. 17, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that a great number of the places throughout the State of Arkansas where wines and beer are licensed to be sold and dispensed are being so operated and conducted as to be inimical to the public peace, health, and safety and that this act is consequently necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act shall be effective immediately upon its adoption and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 585, § 34: approved Apr. 6, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to establish an orderly procedure which will insure the monthly and quarterly distribution of funds for the necessary services and operations of the state government, as provided for in this act, it is necessary that the provisions of this act become effective immediately; that under the provisions of this act seriously needed improvements for many of our public institutions are contemplated, and only the provisions of this act will provide such funds which will be adequate to alleviate this situation; and that only the provisions of this act will correct many of our financial difficulties, and which otherwise may deprive the citizens of this state from receiving the benefits for which the operation of state government contemplates. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1983, No. 420, § 3: Mar. 13, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division should be renewable annually no later than August 31; and that this act is immediately necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 14: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that numerous persons who are resident aliens of the United States desire to operate establishments that dispense alcoholic beverages in the State of Arkansas and that the same are presently prohibited from obtaining a license in their name. It is further found and determined that the requirement of United States citizenship in order to maintain these establishments poses a burden upon commerce and restricts the number of persons who are able to contribute to the overall economy of the State of Arkansas. It is further found and determined that numerous national corporations are hindered in their operations in that they cannot have newly transferred managers or other key employees assume positions of responsibility within their local outlets since those persons do not meet the two (2) year residency requirement and that such requirement poses an unreasonable burden on the conduct of business in this state as it relates to alcohol beverage outlets. It is further found that the present process of applying for or renewing ABC licenses by requiring proof of payment of personal property taxes is cumbersome, unnecessary, and has no direct relationship to the operation of the ABC permitted outlet. It is further found and determined that there are presently numerous conflicting requirements which are applied to applicants for various retail licenses issued by the state ABC Division and that it is necessary and proper that such permit requirements be made uniform. That all of the aforementioned encumbrances are a burden on the transaction of commerce in the state and upon the efficient administration of government in the state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, Nos. 605 and 606, § 27: Mar. 25, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of Arkansas overwhelmingly approved the establishment of lotteries at the 2008 General Election; that lotteries will provide funding for scholarships to the citizens of this state; that the failure to immediately implement this act will cause a reduction in lottery proceeds that will harm the educational and economic success of potential students eligible to receive scholarships under the act; and that the state lotteries should be implemented as soon as possible to effectuate the will of the citizens of this state and implement lottery-funded scholarships as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 857, § 12: Mar. 31, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is essential to the public interest and operation of the alcohol laws in the State of Arkansas; that this act eliminates conflicting language and allows consistent application of alcohol laws; that this act is immediately necessary due to the substantial growth and continued expansion of the brewing industry in Arkansas; that clear and consistent application of the law to the brewing industry is in the public’s immediate interest as is controlling the distribution of alcoholic beverages within the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-5-201. Purpose.

(a)

The purpose of this subchapter is to legalize the manufacture and sale within this state of beer and light wine of an alcoholic content not in excess of five percent (5%) by weight and to so regulate the business of manufacturing and selling such liquors as to prevent the illicit manufacture and consumption of liquors having an alcoholic content in excess of five percent (5%) by weight, the manufacture and sale of which it is not the purpose of this subchapter to legalize.

(b)

It is further the purpose of this subchapter to impose certain licenses, fees, and taxes on, and to regulate, such businesses.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, §§ 1, 10; Pope's Dig., §§ 14192, 14202; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-501, 48-501n.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 29, provided in part that all local or special laws forbidding the sale of light wines and beer were repealed.

3-5-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any substitute therefor and having an alcoholic content not in excess of five percent (5%) by weight;

(2)

“Brewery” means any place where beer as defined by this section is manufactured for sale or consumption;

(3)

“Consumer” means a person who receives or in any way comes into possession of beer and light wines as defined in this section for the purpose of consuming them, giving them away, or distributing them in any way other than by sale, barter, or exchange;

(4)

“Distributor” means any person who receives, either from within or from without this state, light wines and beer as defined by this section for the purpose of distributing them to the dealer either in the original stamped packages as received from the brewery or winery or in bottles as received from the bottler;

(5)(A)

“Home-brewed beer” means beer, ale, porter, stout, and other similar fermented beverages containing one-half of one percent (0.5%) or more of alcohol by volume brewed or produced from malt, wholly or in part, or from a substitute for malt, for consumption but not for sale.

(B)

Any manufacturer of home-brewed beer must have attained twenty-one (21) years of age;

(6)

“Intoxicating liquor” means vinous, ardent, malt fermented liquor or distilled spirits with an alcoholic content in excess of five percent (5%) by weight;

(7)

“Light wine” means the fermented juice of grapes or other small fruits, including berries, and having an alcoholic content not in excess of five percent (5%) by weight;

(8)

“Person” means one (1) or more persons, a company, a corporation, a partnership, a syndicate, or an association;

(9)

“Rule” or “proper rule” means such reasonable rules authorized by law and made and promulgated by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division with the approval of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;

(10)

“Retail dealer” means any person who sells to the consumer light wines or beer in quantities of less than sixteen gallons (16 gals.);

(11)

“Warehouse” means a house or building equipped to maintain such temperature as may be required by the rules promulgated by the director for the storage of beer or wine and a place at which taxes on the beer or wine shall be collected;

(12)

“Wholesale dealer and distributor” means any person who sells beer or light wines to retail dealers in quantities of three gallons (3 gals.) or more; and

(13)

“Winery” means any place where light wine as defined by this section is manufactured for sale or consumption.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 14194; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-503; Acts 1995, No. 1051, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 61; 2019, No. 861, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The printed Acts of 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.) contained an erroneous definition of the term “light wine” which merely duplicated the definition of beer. The definition of “light wine” in this section is that which appears in the enrolled act.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315, in (9), substituted “Rule” for “Regulation”, “proper rule” for “proper regulation”, and “rules” for “regulations”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 861 rewrote (5)(A).

3-5-203. Penalties.

(a)

Any violation of the provisions of this subchapter or of any rule or regulation of the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the violation of any rule or regulation of city legislative bodies relative to the conduct of this business shall be a Class B misdemeanor.

(b)

Any person convicted of violating any provision of this subchapter defined as a misdemeanor by this subchapter and for which no specific punishment is provided shall be punished as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, §§ 17, 29; Pope's Dig., §§ 14209, 14222; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-525, 48-526; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 371.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (a), inserted “Class B” and deleted the former second sentence in (a), which stated: “The punishment shall be by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and imprisonment for not more than six (6) months in the discretion of the court.”

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, classification, §5-1-107.

Misdemeanors, imprisonment and fines, §§5-4-201,5-4-401.

3-5-204. Manufacture, sale, etc., a privilege.

The business of manufacturing, handling, receiving, distributing, or selling the products defined in §3-5-202 is declared under the Constitution and laws of the State of Arkansas to be a privilege.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 14192; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-501.

Cross References.

Exhibition of permit, §3-4-102.

3-5-205. Privilege tax — Levy and collection — Exception — Definition.

(a)

For the privilege of doing business, there shall, each fiscal year beginning July 1, be assessed, levied, and collected from each:

(1)(A)

Wholesale dealer or broker, or distributor in light wine or beer, a special tax of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each county in which the broker, distributor, or wholesale dealer operates.

(B)

However, the special tax shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any one (1) broker, distributor, or wholesale dealer;

(2)

Manufacturer of beer, a special tax of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and

(3)

Retail dealer of nonintoxicating liquor, a special tax of three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

(b)

The tax shall be due and payable at each place where the business of the wholesale dealer, manufacturer, distributor, or retail dealer, as the case may be, is carried on.

(c)

All special taxes shall become due and payable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1 or on commencing business on which the tax is imposed.

(d)

The tax shall be levied, assessed, and collected by such methods, within the limitations prescribed in this subchapter, and under such rules as may be regularly provided.

(e)(1)

However, a grower of grapes and other fruits may manufacture and sell wine upon the premises of the grower in original packages of not less than one-fourth of a gallon
(¼ gal.) from grapes and other fruits actually grown by the party so manufacturing wine upon his or her own premises, free from the license fees and taxes provided in this subchapter.

(2)

A “grower” is defined to be one who actually grows and produces grapes and other fruits upon his or her own premises or upon the premises occupied by him or her as a tenant.

(f)(1)

However, any person in this state may manufacture home-brewed beer or home-manufactured wine:

(A)

Upon his or her own premises free from the license fees and taxes provided in this subchapter;

(B)

For consumption by the manufacturer and his or her family and guests, but not for sale; and

(C)

In quantities per calendar year not to exceed:

(i)

Two hundred gallons (200 gals.) if there are two (2) or more adults in the household; or

(ii)

One hundred gallons (100 gals.) if there is only one (1) adult in the household.

(2)

While the manufacture of beer or wine is declared to be a privilege, the home manufacture of beer or wine in quantities not to exceed two hundred gallons (200 gals.) per calendar year shall be exempted from §3-4-101, §3-4-602,
§3-5-205(a)-(e), §3-5-206, and §3-5-211.

(g)

Home-brewed beer may be removed from the manufacturer’s premises for personal or family use, including without limitation, for organized affairs, exhibitions, competitions, and tastings.

(h)

A microbrewery-restaurant is exempt from this section.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, §§ 4, 11; Pope's Dig., §§ 14196, 14203; Acts 1953, No. 372, § 1; 1957, No. 375, § 1, as added by 1953, No. 118, § 36(F), as added by 1971, No. 585, § 12; 1983, No. 420, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-504, 48-507, 48-313.1; Acts 1993, No. 528, §§ 1, 2; 1995, No. 1051, § 2; 2001, No. 1813, § 1; 2009, No. 294, § 13; 2015, No. 857, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 62; 2019, No. 861, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), redesignated (a)(1), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000) for “two hundred fifty dollars ($250)” in (a)(1)(A), substituted “five thousand dollars ($5,000)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” in (a)(1)(B), substituted “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750)” for “five hundred dollars ($500)” in (a)(2), substituted “three hundred fifty dollars ($350)” for “two hundred dollars ($200)” in (a)(3), and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment added (g).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 861 added (f)(1)(D) [now (g)].

Cross References.

Native brewery, exempt from certain taxes, §3-5-1408.

Renewal of permits, time of payment, §3-4-216.

Tax on beer, §3-7-104.

3-5-206. Issuance of state permit.

(a)

The payment of the special tax provided in §3-5-205 shall be evidenced by a permit issued by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(b)

A permit shall be applied for by the special taxpayer and issued by the director on such forms and under such rules as may be prescribed.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 14196; Acts 1953, No. 372, § 1; 1957, No. 375, § 1, as added by 1953, No. 118, § 36(F), as added by 1971, No. 585, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-504; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 63.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

3-5-207. Scope of state permit.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any permit issued under the provisions of §3-5-206 authorizing the sale of light wines or beer for consumption under the provisions prescribed in the permit shall be construed to authorize the sale of such liquor by the bottle, by the glass or draught, and in or from the original package.

(b)

No permit shall be required for the home manufacture of beer or wine in quantities not to exceed two hundred gallons (200 gals.) per calendar year under §§3-4-101,3-4-602,3-5-206, or3-5-211 as may otherwise be required of other manufacturers.

(c)

Any permit issued under the provisions of §3-5-206 authorizing the manufacture of beer shall allow an Arkansas beer manufacturer to sell and ship to business entities licensed and qualified in the other states to receive beer products brewed in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 15; Pope's Dig., § 14207; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-520; Acts 1995, No. 1051, § 3; 1997, No. 1061, § 1; 2001, No. 1813, § 2.